District of Columbia statutes.
38-195

Common Lottery Board Fund.

(a)

There is established as a special fund the Common Lottery Board Fund (“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Deputy Mayor for Education in accordance with subsections (c) and (d) of this section.

(b)

Deposits into the Fund shall include:

(1)

Appropriated funds;

(2)

Gifts,

(3)

Grants; and

(4)

Donations.

(c)

Money in the Fund shall be used for the continued development and improvement of the common lottery system.

(d)

(1)

The money deposited into the Fund, and interest earned, shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time.

(2)

Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.

June 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-9, § 206
as added Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 4052(b), 61 DCR 9990
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 17-9, § 206, see § 4052(b) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 17-9, § 206, see § 4052(b) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 17-9, § 206, see § 4052(b) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).